Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.
Sec. 18.56.150.
Obligations eligible for investment.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter are securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them.
These obligations may be deposited with any state or municipal officer of any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes, or obligations of the state is authorized by law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.56.160.
Refunding obligations.

The corporation may provide for the issuance of refunding obligations for the purpose of refunding any obligations then outstanding that have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium on them and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the obligations. The issuance of the obligations, the maturities and other details of them, the rights of the holders of them, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the corporation in respect of them are governed by the provisions of this chapter that relate to the issuance of obligations, insofar as those provisions may be appropriate.

Refunding obligations may be sold or exchanged for outstanding obligations issued under this chapter and, if sold, the proceeds may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of the outstanding obligations. Pending the application of the proceeds of refunding obligations, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest, and any redemption premium on the obligations being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the refunding obligations or in the trust agreement securing them, to the payment of any interest on the refunding obligations and any expenses in connection with the refunding, the proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States that mature or that will be subject to redemption, at the option of the holders of them, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing on them, will be required for the purposes intended.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.56.170.
Credit of state not pledged.

Obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter other than state guaranteed bonds do not constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision of the state or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of a political subdivision but are payable solely from the revenue or assets of the corporation. Each obligation issued under this chapter other than a state guaranteed bond shall contain on its face a statement that the corporation is not obligated to pay it nor the interest on it except from the revenue or assets of the corporation and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or of any political subdivision of the state is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the obligation.

Expenses incurred by the corporation in carrying out the provisions of this chapter are payable from funds provided under this chapter and liability may not be incurred by the corporation in excess of these funds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 30 ch 113 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 128 SLA 1984)

Sec. 18.56.180.
Officers not liable.

A member or other officer of the corporation is not subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of having executed or issued any obligations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.56.190.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for their well-being and prosperity, and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions, and the corporation is not required to pay a tax or assessment on any property owned by the corporation under the provisions of this chapter or upon the income from it, except taxes on real property of which the corporation is fee owner.

All obligations issued under this chapter are declared to be issued by a body corporate and public of the state and for an essential public and governmental purpose, and the obligations, and the interest and income on and from the obligations, and all fees, charges, funds, revenues, income, and other money pledged or available to pay or secure the payment of the obligations, or interest on the obligations, are exempt from taxation except for transfer, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.56.200.
Annual report.

The corporation shall prepare and transmit annually a report accounting to the governor for the efficient discharge of all responsibility assigned by law or by directive to the corporation. The corporation shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

By January 10 of each year, the board shall publish a report of the corporation for distribution. The board shall notify the governor, legislature, and the public that the report is available. The report shall be written in easily understandable language. The report must include a financial statement audited by an independent outside auditor, a statement of corporation investments in mortgage loans under this chapter, including an estimate of market value of the mortgage loans, a comparison of the corporation performance with the goals of the corporation, and the levels of bonding and investment activities anticipated in the previous year’s report under (c) of this section, and any other information the board believes would be of interest to the governor, the legislature, and the public. The annual income statement and balance sheet of the corporation shall be published in at least one newspaper in each judicial district. The board may also publish other reports it considers desirable to carry out its purpose.

The corporation shall include in its annual report under (b) of this section an estimate of the investment activity of the corporation in mortgage loans under this chapter for the following 12-month period and an estimate of the amount of bonds to be issued for the investments.

The corporation shall include in its annual report under (b) of this section

a report of its activities under

AS

18.55.010

—

18.55.290

(Housing Project and Public Building Assistance Act);

AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

(programs of moderate income and rental housing);

AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

(Slum Clearance and Redevelopment Act);

a summary of its efforts to implement a program to extend the operation of the programs authorized under AS 18.55 and this chapter to rural communities;

an evaluation of the corporation’s ability to fulfill the objectives of AS

18.56.010(b)

— (e); and

the amount of interest rate, building, and other subsidies for each program of the corporation for which subsidies are given.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1971; am § 30 ch 106 SLA 1980; am §§ 12, 13 ch 115 SLA 1981; am § 95 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 29, 30 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 18.56.205.
Residential mortgage assistance for members of the Alaska delegation to Congress.

The corporation may extend the special mortgage loan purchase program under AS

18.56.098

to purchase a mortgage loan made for the purchase or rehabilitation of a residence located in the District of Columbia or within 50 miles of the District of Columbia to a member of the United States Congress from Alaska if the member is otherwise qualified for assistance under the special mortgage loan purchase program.

History.

(§ 11 ch 102 SLA 1983)

Sec. 18.56.210.
Market stabilization powers.

If the board determines that it is in the best interest of the corporation, the corporation may take appropriate action under this section to stabilize the market price of and demand for residential housing in the state. To accomplish the purposes of this section, the corporation may

make and execute necessary agreements and conveyances under which a borrower may exchange residential housing securing a mortgage loan owned, held, or sold by the corporation for other residential housing owned by the corporation;

repurchase a mortgage loan sold or pledged by the corporation for the purpose of exercising a power conferred by this section;

for the purpose of qualifying residential housing situated in a condominium project for the best available financing for mortgage loans, make and execute agreements and contracts necessary to encourage all owners who occupy units in a condominium project that is not eligible for financing under this chapter to exchange their ownership interest for a condominium unit owned by the corporation in another project;

make and execute appropriate agreements with insurers, investors, and guarantors concerning the temporary removal of residential housing owned by the corporation from the resale market;

convert residential housing owned by the corporation that is designed and constructed for owner occupancy to another beneficial use;

make bulk sales of property owned by the corporation under procedures and terms the corporation determines are in the best interests of the corporation;

after giving due consideration to the interests of competing individual sellers of residential housing, provide financing under terms established by the board to promote the sale of residential housing owned by the corporation;

invest funds of the corporation in the removal and disposal of substandard publicly owned residential housing if the board of directors determines that the investment is prudent, properly secured, and in the long-term best interests of the corporation;

create subsidiary entities to implement a power conferred by this section and to provide insurance under AS

18.56.093

and

18.56.095

;

purchase loans from the former housing assistance loan fund (former AS 44.47.380) if and only if the payments of principal and interest on the loans, or amounts equal to the payments of principal and interest on the loans, are deposited in a separate fund of the corporation to be used for the purposes, and subject to the standards and criteria, of former AS 44.47.360 — 44.47.560 as those statutes provided on June 10, 1988; and

take other actions necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers granted in this subsection.

The corporation shall implement the powers conferred by (a) of this section by adopting regulations under AS

18.56.088

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 147 SLA 1988; am §§ 96, 97 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (a)(10) of this section gives effect to the amendment made by § 97, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, effective July 1, 1992.
From June 26, 1992 to July 1, 1992, under § 96, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, paragraph (a)(10) read as set out above, except that neither occurrence of “former” appeared.
Due to a manifest error, § 150, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992 did not give § 96, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992 an immediate effective date.
The error was corrected under AS

01.05.031

.

Former AS

18.56.210

was renumbered as AS

18.56.900

in 1986.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to a legislative oversight committee in connection with AHFC activities under this section, see 1988 Senate Journal 3681.

Sec. 18.56.220.
Duty to advise about corporation’s programs.

The corporation shall make a reasonable effort, through seminars, training sessions, and other forms of technical assistance, to assist local governments, regional housing authorities, nonprofit organizations, and other organizations and individuals to understand the corporation’s housing programs and the opportunities that exist to obtain financial assistance from the corporation.

History.

(§ 98 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.56.230.
Commercial use in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the corporation; limitations.

The corporation may authorize commercial use in a multi-unit residential housing development it owns or finances if

the use is not prohibited under (b) of this section; and

the total of all commercial uses does not occupy more than a percentage of the space in the multi-unit residential housing development that the corporation has determined is consistent with the corporation’s goal of increasing available affordable housing.

The corporation may not authorize the commercial use of space in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the corporation for

a business that offers adult entertainment;

the sale of alcoholic beverages, unless the sale is in a restaurant or eating place licensed under AS

04.11.100

or is in premises designated by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board as a restaurant under AS

04.16.049

;

substance abuse treatment; or

a business that primarily sells, transfers, or stores cigarettes or tobacco-related products.

This section does not require the corporation to authorize commercial use in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the corporation.

In this section,

“business that offers adult entertainment” has the meaning given in AS

23.10.350(f)

;

“cigarette” has the meaning given in AS

18.74.290

;

“commercial use” includes a business or nonprofit activity conducted by a sole proprietorship, cooperative, corporation, firm, partnership, or other association of persons organized in any manner.

History.

(§ 3 ch 57 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 18.56.340.
Renumbered in 2013.

Sec. 18.56.230.
Commercial use in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the corporation; limitations.

The corporation may authorize commercial use in a multi-unit residential housing development it owns or finances if

the use is not prohibited under (b) of this section; and

the total of all commercial uses does not occupy more than a percentage of the space in the multi-unit residential housing development that the corporation has determined is consistent with the corporation’s goal of increasing available affordable housing.

The corporation may not authorize the commercial use of space in a multi- unit residential housing development owned or financed by the corporation for

a business that offers adult entertainment;

the sale of alcoholic beverages, unless the sale is in premises

licensed under a restaurant or eating place license issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board under AS

04.09.210

or seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board under AS

04.09.360

; or

covered by a restaurant endorsement issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board under AS

04.09.450

;

substance abuse treatment; or

a business that primarily sells, transfers, or stores cigarettes or tobacco-related products.

This section does not require the corporation to authorize commercial use in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the corporation.

In this section,

“business that offers adult entertainment” has the meaning given in AS

23.10.350(f)

;

“cigarette” has the meaning given in AS

18.74.290

;

“commercial use” includes a business or nonprofit activity conducted by a sole proprietorship, cooperative, corporation, firm, partnership, or other association of persons organized in any manner.

History.

(§ 3 ch 57 SLA 2013; am § 157 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 18.56.300.
Construction standards for housing eligible for purchase of loans.

The corporation may not make or purchase a housing loan for residential housing the construction of which begins after June 30, 1992, unless the seller of the mortgage loan complies with the provisions of this section and unless

the unit is in compliance with the construction codes of the municipality, if the unit is located within a municipality that has adopted and enforces construction codes and each of those codes meets or exceeds the comparable standards for similar housing established by the state building code; or

the unit is in compliance with the comparable standards for similar housing established by the state building code

if the unit is located

within a municipality whose construction codes do not meet the standards for similar housing established by the state building code;

within a municipality that does not enforce construction codes; or

outside a municipality; or

as to each specific code within the construction codes of the municipality that has adopted and enforces construction codes if the specific code does not meet or exceed the comparable standard for similar housing established by the state building code.

As a condition of a commitment to purchase or approve a loan under this section for residential housing the construction of which begins after June 30, 1992, the corporation shall require inspection of the unit of residential housing that is the subject of the loan. The inspection must be performed by a municipal building inspector, by an individual who is registered under AS 08.18 to perform home inspections for new construction, by an architect registered under AS 08.48, by an engineer registered under AS 08.48, or by another person approved by the corporation. When the unit of residential housing is located in a rural area, the person who makes the inspection may use methods other than a personal physical inspection to make the inspection if the method is approved by the corporation, and variations from the applicable code may be accepted at the corporation’s discretion, if the person authorized to inspect the unit under this subsection satisfies the corporation that the variation does not adversely affect the structural integrity of the unit or the health and safety of the residents. The person who makes the inspection shall determine whether the construction conforms to relevant provisions of the construction codes of the municipality or of the state building code, as applicable, at each of the following stages of construction:

plan approval;

completion of footings and foundations;

completion of electrical installation, plumbing, and framing;

completion of installation of insulation;

final approval.

A person may not bring an action for damages based on a duty imposed by (b) of this section to inspect a residential unit unless the action is for damages caused by gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

This section does not apply to a nonconforming housing loan made or purchased by the corporation.

In this section,

“construction codes” means, with reference to a municipality, the building, mechanical, plumbing, and electrical codes, or any of them that have been adopted and are enforced by the municipality;

“rural area” means a community with a population of 5,500 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks;

“state building code” means

for building standards, the standards set out in the version of the Uniform Building Code adopted by the Department of Public Safety under AS

18.70.080

, including the provisions of that code applicable to buildings used for residential purposes containing fewer than four dwelling units, notwithstanding the exclusion of those buildings from the Department of Public Safety’s jurisdiction made by AS

18.70.080(a)(2)

;

for mechanical standards, the standards set out in the version of the Uniform Mechanical Code adopted by the Department of Public Safety under AS

18.70.080

, including the provisions of that code applicable to buildings used for residential purposes containing fewer than four dwelling units, notwithstanding the exclusion of those buildings from the Department of Public Safety’s jurisdiction made by AS

18.70.080(a)(2)

;

for plumbing standards, the minimum plumbing code adopted for the state under AS

18.60.705

; and

for electrical standards, the minimum electrical standards prescribed by AS

18.60.580

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 85 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1991; am §§ 1, 2 ch 52 SLA 1991; am § 99 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am §§ 1, 2 ch 81 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 20 SLA 2002; am §§ 34, 35 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraph (e)(2) was enacted as (e)(3). Renumbered in 1994, at which time former (e)(2) was renumbered as (e)(3).

Administrative Code. —

For definitions, see 15 AAC 150, art. 6.

Sec. 18.56.390.
Definitions for AS 18.56.010 — 18.56.390.

In AS

18.56.010

—

18.56.390

, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning,

“adjustable rate mortgage loan” means a mortgage loan with respect to which the interest rate varies or is expected to vary from time to time by reference to an index or formula or other reference point;

“bond” or “obligation” means a bond, bond anticipation note, or other note of the corporation authorized to be issued by the corporation under this chapter, or a mortgage participation certificate issued with respect to mortgages of the corporation;

“construction loan” means a construction loan for land development or residential housing that is secured by a federally insured or guaranteed mortgage or that is insured or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality of the United States, or for which there is a commitment by the United States or an instrumentality of the United States to insure or guarantee such a loan, or a construction loan for land development or residential housing which land development or residential housing will be secured by a mortgage loan;

“development costs” means the costs approved by the corporation as appropriate expenditures that may be incurred by sponsors, builders, and developers of residential housing, before commitment and initial advance of the proceeds of a construction loan or of a mortgage loan, including but not limited to

payments for options to purchase properties on the proposed residential housing site, deposits on contracts of purchase, or, with prior approval of the corporation, payments for the purchase of the properties;

legal and organizational expenses, including payments of attorney fees, project manager, clerical, and other staff salaries, office rent, and other incidental expenses;

payment of fees for preliminary feasibility studies and advances for planning, engineering, and architectural work;

expenses for tenant surveys and market analyses; and

necessary application and other fees;

“governmental agency” means any department, division, public agency, political subdivision, or other public instrumentality of the state or the federal government;

“governmental employer” means the State of Alaska or a municipality or other state or municipal governmental entity within the state, including an agency, instrumentality, district, school district, public corporation, department, division, or other subdivision of the state or of a municipality, in its capacity as an employer;

“housing development fund” means the housing development fund created by AS

18.56.100

;

“land development” means the process of acquiring land primarily for residential housing construction for persons of lower and moderate income and making, installing, or constructing nonresidential housing improvements, including water, sewer, and other utilities, roads, streets, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, storm drainage facilities, and other installations or works, whether on or off the site, that the corporation considers necessary or desirable to prepare the land primarily for residential housing construction;

“mortgage” or “mortgage loan” means a mortgage loan for residential housing insured or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality of the United States or for which there is a commitment by the United States or an instrumentality of the United States to insure or guarantee such a mortgage, or if not so insured or guaranteed or if there is no such commitment, that is secured upon such terms and conditions as the corporation considers necessary or practicable to insure all repayments;

“persons of lower and moderate income” means a person or persons considered by the corporation to require assistance available under this chapter on account of insufficient or inadequate personal or family income or otherwise limited personal financial resources, taking into consideration, without limitation, such factors as

the amount of the total income of the persons available for housing needs;

the size of the family;

the cost and condition of housing facilities available;

standards established for various federal programs determining eligibility based on income of the persons; and

the ability of the persons to compete successfully in the normal housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise is providing decent, safe, and sanitary housing;

“remote, underdeveloped, or blighted areas” means areas considered by the corporation to require assistance available under this chapter on account of insufficient availability of the residential housing necessary to promote, develop, or maintain the economic growth or potential of the area, taking into consideration, without limitation, the following:

the population, resources, and environment of the area;

the present availability and condition of residential housing in and near the area;

the cost of construction and rehabilitation of residential housing in the area;

the availability of other federal or state sponsored programs to facilitate the development of residential housing in the area; and

the ability of residents of the area to finance the purchase of residential housing or to rent or lease residential housing at rates comparable to those in effect in other areas of the state;

“residential building” or “residential housing”

means a specific work or improvement undertaken primarily to provide dwelling accommodations without limitation as to form of lawful occupancy, whether rental, under contract, fee ownership, cooperative housing, condominium, mobile home, or other lawful form of ownership;

includes

special needs housing; and

the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of land, buildings, and improvements to them, and other nonhousing facilities as may be incidental or appurtenant to the land or buildings;

“special needs housing”

means residential housing designed to meet the needs of persons with specific and special housing needs, including supportive services;

includes

housing for the elderly and individuals with a disability or mental illness;

emergency shelter for the homeless; and

transitional housing;

“sponsors” means individuals, public and private corporations, associations, partnerships or other entities, whether or not operated for profit; and consumer housing cooperatives, associations, partnerships, or other entities organized under law for the primary purpose of providing housing to individuals and families of lower and moderate income; it includes organizations engaged in the production, origination, and development of residential housing units intended to qualify for financial assistance under 42 U.S.C. 1437f (sec. 8, Housing Act of 1937), as amended.

History.

(§ 100 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 5 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

The definitions in this section were derived in part from definitions found in AS

18.56.900

before July 1, 1992.

Paragraph (6) was enacted in 2008 as paragraph (14); renumbered in 2008, at which time paragraphs (6) — (13) were renumbered as (7) — (14).